Hawaii statutes.
§651-16 Discharge of writ. If the
defendant recovers judgment or if the plaintiff is nonsuited or if the action
is discontinued or dismissed, all the proceeds of the same and money collected
by the police officer, and all the property attached remaining in the police
officer's hands, shall be delivered to the defendant, or the defendant's agent,
and the order of attachment shall be discharged, and the property released
therefrom. [L 1905, c 84, §16; RL 1925, §2820; RL 1935, §4205; RL 1945, §10156;
RL 1955, §233-16; HRS §651-16; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Cited in determining validity of mortgage made after
attachment. 51 H. 164, 454 P.2d 116.

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next